Utah statutes.
53A-16-103.   Duty of Division of Finance -- Apportionment of fund by state board -- Certification of apportionments.

(1)  The Division of Finance shall give the state superintendent, upon request, a written accounting of the current balance in the Uniform School Fund.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall apportion the fund among the several school districts.

(3)  The state superintendent shall certify the apportionments to the Division of Finance and draws warrants on the state treasurer in favor of the school districts.

